Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-909
Auditor of Public Accounts; annual
audit; report.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall make
an annual audit of the retirement system and submit electronically an annual report to the
Clerk of the Legislature of its condition. Each member of the Legislature
shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the Auditor of Public Accounts. Expenses
of the audit shall be paid from the Expense Fund.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 8, p. 641;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2908;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 442, p. 843;

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 4, p. 1802;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 20;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1508;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 544;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 155.